ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器 > 木管楽器 > ハーモニカ: バスハーモニカ; コードハーモニカ; クロマチックハーモニカ; ダイアトニックハーモニカ; オクターブハーモニカ; オーケストラハーモニカ; トレモロハーモニカ
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Strumenti musicali > Legni > Armoniche: Armoniche per basso; Armoniche per accordi; Armoniche cromatiche; Armoniche diatoniche; Armoniche ottava; Armoniche per orchestra; Armoniche Tremolo
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Glasbila > Lesna pihala > Ustne harmonike: Basovske ustne harmonike; Akordne ustne harmonike; Kromatične ustne harmonike; Diatonične ustne harmonike; Oktavne ustne harmonike; Orkestrske ustne harmonike; Tremolo ustne harmonike
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter > Blæserinstrumenter > Mundharmonikaer: Basharmonikaer; Akkordharmonikaer; Kromatiske harmonikaer; Diatoniske harmonikaer; Oktavharmonikaer; Orkesterharmonikaer; Tremoloharmonikaer
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Nhạc cụ > Nhạc cụ bằng gỗ > Kèn acmônica: Kèn acmônica bass; Kèn acmônica chơi hợp âm; Kèn acmônica Chromatic; Kèn acmônica Diatonic; Kèn acmônica chơi quãng tám; Kèn acmônica dàn nhạc; Kèn acmônica Tremolo
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Instrumentos musicais > Instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Gaitas: Gaitas baixas; Gaitas de acordes; Gaitas cromáticas; Gaitas diatônicas; Gaitas de oitava; Gaitas de orquestra; Gaitas com tremolo
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Musikkinstrumenter > Treblåseinstrumenter > Munnspill: Bassmunnspill; Akkordmunnspill; Kromatiske munnspill; Diatoniske munnspill; Oktavmunnspill; Orkestermunnspill; Tremolomunnspill
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Instruments de musique > Instruments à vent > Harmonicas: Harmonicas basses; Harmonicas d’accords; Harmonicas chromatiques; Harmonicas diatoniques; Harmonicas octaves; Harmonicas d’orchestre; Harmonicas trémolo
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器 > 木管乐器 > 口琴: 低音口琴; 和弦口琴; 半音阶口琴; 全音阶口琴; 八度口琴; 管弦口琴; 颤音口琴
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기 > 목관악기 > 하모니카: 베이스 하모니카; 코드 하모니카; 크로매틱 하모니카; 다이어토닉 하모니카; 옥타브 하모니카; 오케스트라 하모니카; 트레몰로 하모니카
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Instrumente muzicale > Instrumente de suflat > Armonici: Armonici bas; Armonici acord; Armonici cromatice; Armonici diatonice; Armonici octavă; Armonici orchestră; Armonici tremolo
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Muziekinstrumenten > Houten blaasinstrumenten > Harmonica's: Basharmonica's; Akkoordbegeleidingsharmonica's; Chromatische harmonica's; Diatonische harmonica's; Octaafharmonica's; Orkestharmonica's; Tremoloharmonica's
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Glazbala > Drvena puhaća glazbala > Usne harmonike: Bas-usne harmonike; Dvostruke usne harmonike; Kromatske usne harmonike; Dijatonske usne harmonike; Dvooktavne usne harmonike; Orkestarske usne harmonike; Tremolo usne harmonike
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器 > 木管樂器 > 口琴: 低音口琴; 和弦口琴; 半音階口琴; 全音階口琴; 重音口琴; 演奏口琴; 複音口琴
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje > Dřevěné dechové nástroje > Harmoniky: Basové harmoniky; Akordové harmoniky; Chromatické harmoniky; Diatonické harmoniky; Oktávové harmoniky; Koncertní harmoniky; Tremolo harmoniky
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Музикални инструменти > Дървени духови инструменти > Хармоники: Бас хармоники; Акордови хармоники; Хроматични хармоники; Диатонични хармоники; Октавни хармоники; Оркестрови хармоники; Тремоло хармоники
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszerek > Fafúvósok > Szájharmonikák: Basszus-szájharmonikák; Akkord-szájharmonikák; Kromatikus szájharmonikák; Diatonikus szájharmonikák; Oktáv-szájharmonikák; Zenekari szájharmonikák; Tremoló szájharmonikák
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Hudobné nástroje > Drevené dychové nástroje > Harmoniky: Basové harmoniky; Akordové harmoniky; Chromatické harmoniky; Diatonické harmoniky; Oktávové harmoniky; Orchestrálne harmoniky; Tremolo harmoniky
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรี > เครื่องเป่าลมไม้ > หีบเพลงเป่า: หีบเพลงเป่าเบส; หีบเพลงเป่าคอร์ด; หีบเพลงเป่าโครมาติก; หีบเพลงเป่าไดอาโทนิก; หีบเพลงเป่าอ็อกเทฟ; หีบเพลงเป่าออร์เคสตรา; หีบเพลงเป่าเทรโมโล
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Musikinstrumente > Holzblasinstrumente > Mundharmonikas: Bassmundharmonikas; Akkordmundharmonikas; Chromatische Mundharmonikas; Diatonische Mundharmonikas; Oktavenmundharmonikas; Orchestermundharmonikas; Tremolo-Mundharmonikas
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Instrumentos musicais > Madeiras > Harmónicas: Harmónicas baixo; Harmónicas de acordes; Harmónicas cromáticas; Harmónicas diatónicas; Harmónicas afinadas a oitavo; Harmónicas de orquestra; Harmónicas afinadas a tremolo
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Instrumenty muzyczne > Instrumenty dęte drewniane > Harmonijki: Harmonijki basowe; Harmonijki akordowe; Harmonijki chromatyczne; Harmonijki diatoniczne; Harmonijki oktawowe; Harmonijki orkiestrowe; Harmonijki tremolo
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Instrumentos musicales > Instrumentos de viento madera > Armónicas: Armónicas bajo; Armónicas de acordes; Armónicas cromáticas; Armónicas diatónicas; Armónicas de octava; Armónicas orquestales; Armónicas de trémolo
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instruments > Woodwinds > Harmonicas: Bass Harmonicas; Chord Harmonicas; Chromatic Harmonicas; Diatonic Harmonicas; Octave Harmonicas; Orchestral Harmonicas; Tremolo Harmonicas
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Музыкальные инструменты > Деревянные духовые инструменты > Губные гармоники: Басовые губные гармоники; Аккордовые губные гармоники; Хроматические губные гармоники; Диатонические губные гармоники; Октавные губные гармоники; Оркестровые губные гармоники; Губные тремоло-гармоники
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Musikinstrument > Träblåsinstrument > Munspel: Basmunspel; Ackordmunspel; Kromatiska munspel; Diatoniska munspel; Oktavmunspel; Orkestermunspel; Tremolomunspel
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soittimet > Puupuhaltimet > Huuliharput: Bassohuuliharput; Sointuhuuliharput; Kromaattiset huuliharput; Diatoniset huuliharput; Oktaavihuuliharput; Orkesterihuuliharput; Tremolohuuliharput
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Μουσικά όργανα > Ξύλινα πνευστά > Φυσαρμόνικες: Μπάσο φυσαρμόνικες; Φυσαρμόνικες Chord; Χρωματικές φυσαρμόνικες; Διατονικές φυσαρμόνικες; Φυσαρμόνικες οκτάβας; Φυσαρμόνικες ορχήστρας; Τρέμολο φυσαρμόνικες
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aletleri > Nefesli Çalgılar > Mızıkalar: Bas Mızıkalar; Akor Mızıkaları; Kromatik Mızıkalar; Diyatonik Mızıkalar; Oktav Mızıkaları; Orkestra Mızıkaları; Tremolo Mızıkalar
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai > Mediniai pučiamieji instrumentai > Lūpinės armonikėlės: Bosinės lūpinės armonikėlės; Akordinės lūpinės armonikėlės; Chromatinės lūpinės armonikėlės; Diatoninės lūpinės armonikėlės; Oktavinės lūpinės armonikėlės; Orkestrinės lūpinės armonikėlės; Tremolo lūpinės armonikėlės